Missouri, session 2026, SB1191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 143, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 143.2225, to read as
follows:
143.2225. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Next Generation Family Act".
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, a taxpayer with three or more children for which the
taxpayer is entitled to a dependency exemption for federal
income tax purposes, regardless of whether the exemption
amount as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 151 is zero, shall be
exempt from the tax levied and imposed pursuant to this
chapter.
3. The department of revenue shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with

SB 1191 2
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓